Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.139

Membership while serving as state legislator—Conditions.

Any member of the retirement system who, on or after January 1, 1995, is on leave of absence for the purpose of serving as a state legislator, may elect to continue to be a member of this retirement system. The member shall continue to receive service credit subject to the following:

(1) The member will not receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month;

(2) Employer contributions shall be paid by the legislature;

(3) Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would have received had such a member not served in the legislature;

(4) The service and compensation credit under this section shall be granted only for periods during which the legislature is in session; and

(5) No service credit for service as a legislator will be allowed after a member separates from employment with the Washington state patrol.

[ 1997 c 123 s 1.]